Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8180.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 72.13
CHILDREN'S MOBILE RESPONSE AND STABILIZATION SERVICES
42-72.13-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of children, youth and families (DCYF).
(2) "Designated MRSS provider" means a community-based provider licensed or
contracted by the department to deliver MRSS.
(3) "Medicaid agency" means the Medicaid program administered within the executive
office of health and human services (EOHHS).
(4) "Mobile response and stabilization services" or "MRSS" means community-based
behavioral health crisis services for children and youth up to the age of twenty-one (21), including:
(i) Rapid mobile crisis response;
(ii) Crisis assessment and de-escalation;
(iii) Short-term stabilization and follow-up services; and
(iv) Care coordination with families, schools, healthcare providers, and community-based
organizations.

(5) "Natural environment" means homes, schools, childcare settings, and other community
locations in which children and youth typically live, learn, or receive care.
42-72.13-2. Establishment of a statewide MRSS program.
(a) The department, in coordination with the Medicaid agency, shall establish and
administer a statewide mobile response and stabilization services program, and shall ensure
alignment with the Children's Behavioral Health Consent Decree that was ordered in United States
v. State of Rhode Island, C.A. No. 24-cv-00531.
(b) The department shall establish standards for MRSS service fidelity.
(c) MRSS shall be available statewide, twenty-four (24) hours per day, seven (7) days per
week, to all children and youth regardless of insurance status or Medicaid eligibility.
(d) The department shall license a minimum of two (2) MRSS providers and a maximum
of three (3) providers for the entire State of Rhode Island.
(1) Each licensed MRSS provider shall be responsible to provide MRSS to all children and
youth up to the age of twenty-one (21) to their agreed geographic region or catchment area as
established by the department.
(2) Licensed MRSS geographic catchment areas shall be through the assignment of the
specific cities and towns and ensure sustainability and community connection.
(e) No prior authorization, referral, or clinical intake determination shall be required for
initiation of MRSS.
(f) Services pursuant to this chapter shall be delivered in the child's natural environment
whenever clinically appropriate.
(g) All requests for MRSS shall be presumed eligible for response under a no wrong door
standard, and services shall not be denied or delayed due to:
(1) Payer status;
(2) Referral source; or
(3) Clinical screening thresholds inconsistent with a family-defined crisis.
42-72.13-3. Service delivery standards.
(a) Response time. Designated MRSS providers shall provide in-person mobile response
within sixty (60) minutes of initial contact, unless clinically contraindicated. Telephonic or virtual
response shall not substitute for in-person response except where clinically appropriate and
determined by MRSS staff.
(b) Service components. MRSS shall include, at a minimum:
(1) Crisis assessment and de-escalation;
(2) Family engagement and support;
LC005248/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 7

(3) Short-term stabilization services of sufficient duration to support safe resolution of the
crisis; and
(4) Transition planning and linkage to ongoing behavioral health, educational, and
community supports.
(c) Designated provider MRSS teams shall consist of a minimum of two (2) staff, including
at least one licensed behavioral health clinician qualified to conduct clinical assessments and one
additional team member, which may include a peer support specialist, family partner, or other
trained paraprofessional. Providers shall ensure access to clinical supervision and psychiatric
consultation on a twenty-four (24) hour basis.
(d) Workforce composition. Designated MRSS provider teams shall include licensed
clinicians and may include peer support specialists, family navigators, and other trained staff with
demonstrated expertise in children's behavioral health.
(e) Cultural and linguistic competency. MRSS designated providers shall deliver services
in a culturally and linguistically responsive manner and shall ensure accessibility for individuals
with disabilities.
(f) Coordination with crisis lines. MRSS shall serve as the primary, mobile crisis response
system for children and youth experiencing behavioral health crises. MRSS shall operate in
coordination with, but remain clinically and operationally distinct from, the 988 Suicide and Crisis
Lifeline (988) and other telephonic triage or referral lines, including Kids' Link RI. Referrals to
designated MRSS providers shall originate from 988, Kids' Link RI, 911, schools, child welfare
agencies, healthcare providers, law enforcement, families, or self-referral; provided, however, that
988 and other telephonic triage or referral lines may receive, assess, de-escalate, and route crisis
contacts with applicable law, and designated MRSS providers shall retain clinical discretion in
accordance with nationally recognized fidelity standards regarding deployment, response modality,
and timing. Coordination with 988 and other crisis lines shall not result in unnecessary screening,
triage delays, or redirection that substitutes telephonic intervention for in-person mobile response
when MRSS is clinically appropriate. Nothing in this section shall permit 988 or any call center
entity to control dispatch or clinical decision-making for MRSS services once a referral has been
made. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require designated MRSS providers to operate
or staff a call center, crisis hotline, or telephonic triage service.
(g) Coordination with certified community behavioral health clinics (CCBHC). Designated
MRSS providers shall coordinate with CCBHCs and other behavioral health providers for purposes
of referral, care transitions, information-sharing, and continuity of care when clinically appropriate
and with appropriate consent.
LC005248/SUB A/2 - Page 3 of 7

(1) Designated MRSS providers may execute non-financial coordination agreements
and/or designated collaborating organization (DCO agreements) with coordinating entities such as
pediatricians, law enforcement, hospitals and other child and youth serving entities.
(2) Coordination shall not require MRSS to be operated by, embedded within,
subcontracted to, or financially dependent upon a CCBHC, nor shall it limit the department's
authority to contract directly with community-based designated MRSS providers. MRSS shall
remain a distinct mobile crisis response and stabilization service with independent clinical decision-
making authority.
(h) Child and family competency requirement. MRSS shall be delivered by designated
MRSS providers with demonstrated expertise in child and adolescent behavioral health and family
systems. Designated MRSS providers shall ensure that licensed clinical staff assigned to MRSS
possess training and experience specific to children, youth and families, including child
development, trauma-informed care, family engagement, and coordination with child-serving
systems. Providers that primarily serve adult populations shall not deliver MRSS unless they
demonstrate child-specific capacity, staffing, and supervision as required by this chapter.
42-72.13-4. Funding.
On or before October 1, 2027, the Medicaid agency shall submit to the legislature a report
outlining the necessary steps and activities required to complete an alternative funding
methodology for Medicaid MRSS payments including any costs associated with implementation.
Implementation of the alternative methodology shall occur no later than October 1, 2028 in
accordance with federal approval.
42-72.13-5. Medicaid coverage.
(a) The Medicaid agency shall designate MRSS as a covered Medicaid service for eligible
children and youth up to the age of twenty-one (21), including coverage pursuant to the early and
periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) benefit.
(b) The Medicaid agency shall submit any necessary state plan amendments or waiver
applications to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement this section.
(c) The Medicaid agency shall ensure compliance with all applicable EPSDT requirements
for Medicaid eligible children and youth accessing MRSS.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent the Medicaid agency from implementing
utilization management or prior authorization to ensure program integrity and compliance with
federal Medicaid requirements.
42-72.13-6. Provider designation and contracting.
(a) The department shall license and oversee community-based designated MRSS
LC005248/SUB A/2 - Page 4 of 7

providers. The department may enter into contracts as necessary for payment and administrative
purposes; however, designation as an MRSS provider shall be based on licensure, not procurement
status.
(b) In designating MRSS providers, the department shall prioritize:
(1) MRSS providers with demonstrated experience in children's behavioral health crisis
services;
(2) Existing community-based providers currently delivering mobile crisis or stabilization
services; and
(3) Geographic coverage sufficient to ensure statewide access.
(c) Designated MRSS provider contracts shall establish reimbursement rates, performance
standards, reporting requirements, and care coordination expectations.
(d) The department shall establish a licensure category specific to children’s mobile
response and stabilization services, including standards for clinical staffing, child and family
expertise, and service delivery requirements. Each designated MRSS provider shall be responsible
to provide MRSS to all children and youth up to the age of twenty-one (21) and demonstrate a
willingness to provide services for the purposes of mutual aid to other licensed MRSS providers
when needed.
(e) No provider shall deliver MRSS unless licensed pursuant to this chapter.
42-72.13-7. Oversight and reporting.
(a) The department shall collect data on MRSS utilization, response times, outcomes, and
cost avoidance.
(b) No later than January 1 of each year, the department shall submit a report to the
governor and the general assembly detailing:
(1) Program utilization and geographic coverage;
(2) Funding sources and expenditures;
(3) Outcomes related to emergency department and inpatient diversion; and
(4) Recommendations for statutory or budgetary changes.
42-72.13-8. Rulemaking authority.
The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this chapter.
The rules and regulations shall establish a statewide MRSS mutual aid framework to ensure
coverage during periods of high demand, workforce shortages, or regional capacity constraints.
42-72.13-9. Severability.
If any provision of this act is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions
of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision.
LC005248/SUB A/2 - Page 5 of 7

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005248/SUB A/2
========
LC005248/SUB A/2 - Page 6 of 7